District of Columbia statutes.
6-703.04

Occupancy after receipt of notice.

It shall be unlawful for any person to occupy any building 30 days after notice in writing from the Mayor of the District of Columbia or his designated agents that the owner entitled to the beneficial use, rental, or control of any building has failed or neglected to comply with the notice provided for by § 6-703.05 to provide any such building with means of egress or appliances required by the regulations promulgated by the Council of the District of Columbia under § 6-703.03.

Dec. 24, 1942, 56 Stat. 1083, ch. 818, § 2

History

1981 Ed., § 5-519.
1973 Ed., § 5-318.

Prior Codifications

This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.

Change in Government